Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 11. Continuance and Transfer

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-1101.
Continuance.

Consistent with subsection (d) of this section, a foreign foundation organized under the laws of a foreign jurisdiction may apply to the secretary of state for registration under this act, upon acknowledgement by the foreign jurisdiction that the domicile of the foreign foundation in that jurisdiction has terminated.

The secretary of state may issue a certificate of registration upon receipt of an application supported by articles of continuance specified by subsection (e) of this section together with the other statements, information and documents required by this section.

Upon issuance of a certificate of registration by the secretary of state, the foreign foundation shall continue to operate under the laws of this state as if the foreign foundation had been organized as a statutory foundation in this state. The secretary of state may impose limitations or conditions on a certificate of registration as appropriate.

The secretary of state shall cause notice of issuance of a certificate of registration to be given to the proper officer of the foreign jurisdiction in which the foreign foundation was previously organized.

Articles of continuance filed with the secretary of state by a foreign foundation under this section shall contain:

A certified copy of the original articles of formation of the foundation, including any amendments thereto, or its equivalent basic charter or other authorization;

The name of the foreign foundation and the foreign jurisdiction in which the foundation was lawfully organized;

The date of organization of the foreign foundation in the foreign jurisdiction;

The principal mailing address of the foreign foundation;

The name and address of the proposed registered agent in this state;

Any additional information specified for articles of formation under W.S.

17-30-303

.

An application for articles of continuance shall be executed by any member of the board of directors of the foreign foundation or any officer authorized to execute the application on behalf of the foundation.

The provisions of the articles of continuance may vary from the provisions of the articles of formation of the foreign foundation, the equivalent basic charter or other authorization in the foreign jurisdiction only if those variations could be lawfully effectuated by amending articles of formation as otherwise provided under this act.

Upon issuance of a certificate of registration by the secretary of state, the articles of continuance shall be deemed to be the articles of formation of the foreign foundation. The foreign foundation may elect to incorporate by reference in its articles of continuance the basic charter or other authorization adopted in the foreign jurisdiction in which the foreign foundation was formed, for the purpose of continuing to act under the charter or other authorization, provided that the basic charter or other authorization shall be deemed amended to the extent necessary to make the charter or authorization conform to this act and other provisions of law.

The existence of a foreign foundation that is issued a certificate of continuation under this act shall be deemed to have commenced on the date the foreign foundation commenced its existence in the foreign jurisdiction in which it was first formed, organized or otherwise came into being. The laws of this state shall apply to a foreign foundation continuing under this act to the same extent as if it had been organized under the laws of this state from and after the issuance of a certificate of continuation under this act by the secretary of state. If a foreign foundation is continued under this act, the continuance shall not affect the ownership of its property or its liability for any existing obligations, causes of action, claims, pending or threatened prosecutions or civil or administrative actions, or other convictions, rulings, orders or judgments.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-1102.
Transfer of a statutory foundation to another jurisdiction.

A statutory foundation formed or continued under this act may, if authorized under subsection (f) of this section and by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction, apply to the proper officer of the foreign jurisdiction for a certificate of registration and to the secretary of state of this state for a certificate of transfer. The application for a certificate of transfer shall set forth the following:

The name of the statutory foundation immediately before the transfer, and if that name is unavailable for use in the foreign jurisdiction or, if the foundation desires to change its name in connection with the transfer, the name by which the foundation will be known in the foreign jurisdiction;

The name of the foreign jurisdiction to which the foundation is to be transferred;

Acknowledgement that the foundation shall surrender its articles of formation under this act upon transfer to the foreign jurisdiction; and

A statement that the transfer was duly approved by the board of directors in the manner required by subsection (f) of this section.

The secretary of state shall require that a statutory foundation transferred under this section maintain an agent for service of process within this state for at least one (1) year after the transfer is complete and may impose any conditions the secretary of state considers appropriate for the protection of creditors, including the provision of notice to the public of the application described in subsection (a) of this section, the provision of a bond or a deposit of funds in an appropriate bank located in Wyoming and subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of Wyoming. If any conditions imposed under this subsection are not met, the secretary of state may refuse to issue a certificate of transfer.

The secretary of state shall, upon compliance by the applicant with subsections (a) and (b) of this section and receipt of payment under subsection (e) of this section, immediately transmit a notice of issuance of a certificate of transfer to the proper officer of the foreign jurisdiction to which the statutory foundation is transferred.

For the purposes of the laws of this state, upon issuance of a certificate of transfer, the statutory foundation shall be continued as if it had been organized under the laws of the foreign jurisdiction and shall become a statutory foundation under the laws of the foreign jurisdiction, upon issuance by such foreign jurisdiction of a certificate of registration.

In addition to all other fees and impositions, a statutory foundation organized or continued under the laws of this state shall pay to the secretary of state a special fee established by rule before receiving a certificate of transfer pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

A resolution to transfer the statutory foundation to a foreign jurisdiction shall be adopted by the board of directors unless the operating agreement of the foundation provides otherwise.

The statutory foundation may represent to the proper officer of the foreign jurisdiction to which the statutory foundation is transferred that the laws of this state permit such transfer, and may describe the authorization extended by this section as permitting the continuance or other transfer of domicile as may be required by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction, in order for the statutory foundation to be accepted in that foreign jurisdiction, provided that the statutory foundation may not misrepresent the requirements or effects of this section.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.